Utah statutes.
17-18-1.9.   Creation of prosecution district by ordinance or interlocal agreement.

(1)  The county governing body may create a countywide state prosecution district by ordinance.

(2) (a)  Two or more counties, whether or not contiguous, may unite to create and maintain a state prosecution district by interlocal agreement pursuant to Title 11, Chapter 13.

(b)  At the time of the creation of the prosecution district, the participating counties shall be located within the same judicial district.

(3)  The county governing body or bodies shall not dissolve a prosecution district during the term of office of an elected or appointed district attorney.

